Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.510

Attorney general as advisor.

The attorney general of the state shall be the legal advisor to the presidents and the boards of regents and trustees of the institutions of higher education and he or she shall institute and prosecute or defend all suits in behalf of the same.

[ 2011 c 336 s 710; 1973 c 62 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.510. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 242 s 8; RRS s 4560; prior: 1897 c 118 s 189; 1890 p 399 s 19. Formerly RCW 28.77.125; 28.76.300.]

NOTES:

Savings—1973 c 62: "Nothing in this 1973 amendatory act shall be construed to affect any existing right acquired under the statutes amended or repealed herein or the term of office or election or appointment or employment of any person elected, appointed or employed under the statutes amended or repealed herein." [ 1973 c 62 s 26.]

Severability—1973 c 62: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 c 62 s 28.]

Attorney general's powers in general: Chapter 43.10 RCW.

Employment of attorneys by state agencies restricted: RCW 43.10.067.